Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8309
Facilities not previously licensed; legislative intent.

If the Legislature finds that it is necessary for the protection of the public to regulate categories of facilities not previously regulated by state law after reviewing the criteria in section 71-8308 and considering governmental and societal costs and benefits, it is the intent of the Legislature that the least restrictive regulatory provisions consistent with protecting the public health, safety, and welfare be implemented.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 115.